District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.115b

Deadline for appointment of Inspector General.

(a)

In general. —

Not later than 30 days after its members are appointed, the Mayor shall appoint the Inspector General of the District of Columbia pursuant to § 1-301.115a(a)(1).

(b)

Transition rule. —

The term of service of the individual serving as the Inspector General under § 1-301.115a(a) prior to the appointment of the Inspector General by the Authority under § 1-301.115a(a)(1) shall expire upon the appointment of the Inspector General by the Authority.

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 151, Pub. L. 104-8, § 303(e)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 782, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11711(b)
This section is referenced in § 2-321.01.
2001 Ed., § 2-321.01
1981 Ed., § 1-1182.8a.
‘Its members’, referred to in subsec. (a), are the members of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority.